Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated  to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 4,743,342
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 15,565,451
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 14,924,863
(4) Market access ........................... $ 5,967,036
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and in-
cluding federal funds for contract  services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or  received by the State Department of Agriculture, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 14,193,611
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 30,876,527
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 28,555,096
(4) Market access ........................... $ 25,122,844
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,925,046 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the State Department of Agriculture for the Oregon Plan, to be used  for activities
and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2025  Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Agriculture, for the following purposes:
(1) Food safety ............................... $ 2,506,120
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 1
(2) Natural resources ..................... $ 9,555,644
(3) Market access ........................... $ 11,681,964
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 2